Washington statutes.
RCW 30A.32.010

Membership in federal reserve system—Investment in stock of Federal Deposit Insurance Corporation.

Any bank or mutual savings bank may become a member of the federal reserve system of the United States and to that end may comply with all laws of the United States and all rules, regulations and requirements promulgated pursuant thereto, including the investment of its funds in the stock of a federal reserve bank; and any bank or mutual savings bank, whether a member of the federal reserve system or not, may invest its funds in the stock of the Federal Deposit Insurance Corporation created by the act of congress approved June 16, 1933, and may participate in the insurance of bank deposits and obligate itself for the cost of such participation by assessments or otherwise in accordance with the laws of the United States.

[ 2014 c 37 s 200; 1955 c 33 s 30.32.010. Prior: 1933 ex.s. c 9 s 1; RRS s 3235-1. Formerly RCW 30.32.010.]